Texas statutes.
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CODE

TITLE 3. LICENSES AND PERMITS

SUBTITLE A. PERMITS

CHAPTER 35. AGENTS

Sec. 35.01. AUTHORIZED ACTIVITIES. (a) An agent may:

(1) represent permittees other than retailers within this state who are authorized to sell liquor to retail dealers in the state; and

(2) solicit and take orders for the sale of liquor from authorized permittees.

(b) A person acting as an agent may only represent one permitted or licensed business at a time while soliciting or taking orders.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 443, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 130, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 35.05. SAMPLES. An agent may not transport or carry liquor as samples, but may carry or display empty sample containers.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 443, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 131, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 35.06. INELIGIBILITY TO SERVE AS NONRESIDENT SELLER'S AGENT. A person acting as an agent under this chapter may not act as a nonresident seller's agent under Chapter 36.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 443, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 132, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 35.07. UNAUTHORIZED REPRESENTATION. An agent in soliciting or taking orders for the sale of liquor may not represent that the agent is an agent of any person other than the person who employs the agent or who has authorized the agent to represent the person.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 444, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 133, eff. September 1, 2019.